Utah statutes.
19-6-102.1.   Treatment and disposal -- Exclusions.

As used in Subsections 19-6-104 (1)(e)(ii)(B), 19-6-108(3)(b) and (3)(c)(ii)(B), and 19-6-119(1)(a), the term "treatment and disposal" specifically excludes the recycling, use, reuse, or reprocessing of fly ash waste, bottom ash waste, slag waste, or flue gas emission control waste generated primarily from the combustion of coal or other fossil fuels; waste from the extraction, beneficiation, and processing of ores and minerals; or cement kiln dust, including recycle, reuse, use, or reprocessing for road sanding, sand blasting, road construction, railway ballast, construction fill, aggregate, and other construction-related purposes.

